Oklahoma, session 2025, SB727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 60 O.S. 2021, Section 121, as last


amended by Section 1, Chapter 373, O.S.L. 2024 (60 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 121), is amended to read as follows:


Section 121. A. As used in Sections 121 through 127 of this


title:


1. “Deed” means any instrument in writing whereby land is


assigned, transferred, or otherwise conveyed to, or vested in, the



Req. No. 846 Page 1


person coming into title or, at his or her direction, any other


person;


2. “Country of Particular Concern” means any country designated


by the United States Secretary of State as hostile or a Country of


Particular Concern (CPC);


3. “Foreign adversary company” means any company other than a


U.S. person or U.S. subsidiary as defined in 15 C.F.R., Section


772.1 that:


a. is domiciled, incorporated, issued, or listed in a


CPC,


b. is headquartered in a CPC,


c. has its principal place of business in a CPC,


d. is controlled by the government of a CPC or the


military or ruling political party of a CPC, or


e. is majority-owned by an entity controlled by the


government of a CPC or the military or ruling


political party of a CPC.


If a parent company does not meet any of the criteria listed in


this paragraph and does not recognize more than fifty percent (50%)


of the total annual global revenue of the parent company and


subsidiaries from a CPC, the parent company shall not be considered


a foreign adversary company solely because one or more subsidiaries


or affiliates meets the criteria set forth in subparagraph a of this


paragraph;

Req. No. 846 Page 2


4. “Foreign government adversary” means a government other than


the federal government of the United States, the government of any


state, political subdivision of the state, tribe, territory, or


possession of the United States and designated by the United States


Secretary of State as hostile or a Country of Particular Concern


(CPC);


3. 5. “Foreign government enterprise” means a business entity,


sovereign wealth fund, or state-backed investment fund in which a


foreign government adversary holds a controlling interest;


4. 6. “Foreign government entity” means a government other than


the federal government of the United States, the government of any


state, political subdivision of the state, tribe, territory, or


possession of the United States; and


5. 7. “Land” means the same as defined in Section 6 of this


title, but shall not include oil, gas, other minerals, or any


interest therein.


B. No alien or any person who is not a citizen of the United


States, foreign adversary company, or foreign government adversary


shall acquire title to or own land in this state either directly or


indirectly through a business entity, trust, or foreign government


enterprise, except as hereinafter provided, but they shall have and


enjoy in this state such rights as to personal property as are, or


shall be, accorded a citizen of the United States under the laws of


the nation to which such alien belongs, or by the treaties of such

Req. No. 846 Page 3


nation with the United States, except as the same may be affected by


the provisions of Section 121 et seq. of this title or the


Constitution of this state. Provided, however, the requirements of


this subsection shall not apply to a business entity that is engaged


in regulated interstate commerce or has a national security


agreement with the Committee on Foreign Investment in the United


States (CFIUS) in accordance with federal law.


C. On or after November 1, 2023, any deed recorded with a


county clerk shall include as an exhibit to the deed an affidavit


executed by the person, the person’s attorney-in-fact, a court-


appointed guardian or personal representative, an authorized officer


of the entity, or trustee of the trust coming into title attesting


that the person, business entity, or trust is obtaining the land in


compliance with the requirements of this section and that no funding


source is being used in the sale or transfer in violation of this


section or any other state or federal law. A county clerk shall not


accept and record any deed without an affidavit as required by this


section which is duly notarized pursuant to Title 49 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to a:


1. Deed which, without additional consideration, confirms,


corrects, modifies, or supplements a deed previously recorded;


2. Deed made by a grantor to cure a defect in title or


effectuate a disclaimer of interest in real property;



Req. No. 846 Page 4


3. Transfer-on-death deed made by a grantor designating a


grantee beneficiary pursuant to the Nontestamentary Transfer of


Property Act, Section 1251 et seq. of Title 58 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


4. State or federal court order in an action to quiet title or


to cure a defect in title;


5. State or federal court order or decree in probate,


partition, quiet title, and divorce actions;


6. Deed which secures a debt or other obligation, or which


releases such property as security for a debt or other obligation;


7. Deed of dedication to the public; or


8. Deed in favor of the United States or any of its political


subdivisions, a state or any of its political subdivisions, or a


tribe.


The applicable exemption shall be shown on the face of the deed


prior to the recording of the deed and no affidavit shall be


required.


D. The Attorney General shall promulgate a separate affidavit


form for individuals and for business entities or trusts to comply


with the requirements of this section. The Attorney General may


establish additional exemptions which the Attorney General deems


necessary to substantially comply with the requirements of this


section. The county clerk may accept an affidavit in substantial



Req. No. 846 Page 5


compliance with the affidavit form promulgated by the Attorney


General.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-846 TEK 1/19/2025 5:42:06 AM







































Req. No. 846 Page 6